Washington statutes.
RCW 43.05.150

Agency immunity—Enforcement authority.

Nothing in this chapter obligates a regulatory agency to conduct a technical assistance visit. The state and officers or employees of the state shall not be liable for damages to a person to the extent that liability is asserted to arise from providing technical assistance, or if liability is asserted to arise from the failure of the state or officers or employees of the state to provide technical assistance. This chapter does not limit the authority of any regulatory agency to take any enforcement action, other than a civil penalty, authorized by law. This chapter shall not limit a regulatory agency's authority to issue a civil penalty as authorized by law based upon a person's failure to comply with specific terms and conditions of any permit or license issued by the agency to that person.

[ 1995 c 403 s 617.]